Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Chapter 7. Surface Mining and Reclamation of Land
§ 53-7-35.
Reclamation standards and methods; alternative methods; concurrent reclamation; continuing right of entry; action on bond.

Any permit issued under this chapter shall require operations to comply with all applicable reclamation standards of this chapter. Reclamation standards shall apply to all operations, exploration activities and reclamation operations covered by this chapter and shall require the operator at a minimum to:

Conduct operations in a manner consistent with prudent mining practice, so as to maximize the utilization and conservation of the resource being recovered; and, in keeping with the intent of maximizing the value of mined land, stockpiles of commercially valuable material may remain, if they are ecologically stable. Stockpiling shall be subject to rules and regulations adopted by the commission;

Restore the affected area so that it may be used for a useful, productive and beneficial purpose, including an agricultural, grazing, commercial, residential or recreational purpose, including lakes, ponds, wetlands, wildlife habitat, or other natural or forested areas;

Conduct water drainage and silt control for the affected area to strictly control soil erosion, damage to adjacent lands and pollution of waters of the state, both during and following the mining operations. Before, during and for a reasonable period after mining, all drainways for the affected area shall be protected with silt traps or dams of approved design as directed by the regulations. The operator may impound water to provide wetlands, lakes or ponds of approved design for wildlife, recreational or water supply purposes, if it is a part of the approved reclamation plan;

Remove or cover all metal, lumber and other refuse, except vegetation, resulting from the operation;

Regrade the area to the nearest approximate original contour or rolling topography, and eliminate all highwalls and spoil piles, except as provided in an approved reclamation plan. Lakes, ponds or wetlands may be constructed, if part of an approved reclamation plan;

Stabilize and protect all affected areas sufficiently to control erosion and attendant air and water pollution;

Remove the topsoil, if any, from the affected area in a separate layer, and place it on any authorized lieu lands to be reclaimed or replace it on the backfill area. If not utilized immediately, the topsoil shall be segregated in a separate pile from other spoil. If the topsoil is not replaced on a backfill area of authorized lieu lands within a time short enough to avoid deterioration, the topsoil shall be protected by a successful cover of plants or by other means approved by the Permit Board. If topsoil is of insufficient quantity or of poor quality for sustaining vegetation and if other strata can be shown to be as suitable for vegetation requirements, then the operator may petition the Permit Board for permission to be exempt from the requirement s for the removal, segregation and preservation of topsoil and to remove, segregate and preserve in a like manner other strata which is best able to support vegetation or to mix strata, if that mixing can be shown to be equally suitable for revegetation requirements;

Replace, if required, available topsoil or the best available subsoil on top of the land to be reclaimed or on top of authorized lieu lands being reclaimed;

Minimize the disturbances to the prevailing hydrologic balance at the mine site and in associated off-site areas and to the quality and quantity of water in surface and groundwater systems both during and after surface mining operations and during reclamation by:

1. Preventing or removing water from contact with toxic-material producing deposits;

2. Treating drainage to reduce toxic material content; and

3. Casing, sealing or otherwise managing boreholes, shafts and wells to keep acid or other toxic material drainage from entering ground and surface waters;

Avoiding acid or other toxic mine drainage by using measures such as, but not limited to:

Conducting operations to prevent unreasonable additional levels of suspended solids to streamflow or runoff outside the permit area above natural levels under seasonal flow conditions;

Removing temporary or large siltation structures from drainways, consistent with good water conservation practices, after disturbed areas are revegetated and stabilized;

Performing any other actions as the commission may prescribe under rules and regulations adopted under this chapter;

Stabilize any waste piles;

Incorporate current engineering practices for the design and construction of water retention structures for the disposal of mine wastes, processing wastes or other liquid or solid wastes which, at a minimum, shall be compatible with the requirements of applicable state and federal laws and regulations, insure that leachate will not pollute surface or ground water, and locate water retention structures so as not to endanger public health and safety should failure occur;

Insure that all debris, acid-forming materials, toxic materials or materials constituting a fire hazard are treated or disposed of in a manner designed to prevent contamination of ground or surface waters or combustion;

Insure that construction, maintenance and postmining conditions of access roads into and across the permit area will minimize erosion and siltation, pollution of air and water, damage to fish or wildlife or their habitat, or public or private property. The Permit Board may authorize the retention after mining of certain access roads if compatible with the approved reclamation plan;

Refrain from the construction of roads or other access ways up a stream bed or drainage channel or in proximity to a channel where the construction would seriously alter the normal flow of water;

Revegetate the affected area with plants, approved by the department, to attain a useful, productive and beneficial purpose, including an agricultural, grazing, industrial, commercial, residential or recreational purpose, including lakes, ponds, wetlands, wildlife habitat or other natural or forested areas;

Assume responsibility for successful revegetation for a period of two (2) years beyond the date of initial bond release on any bond or deposit held by the department as provided by Section 53-7-67;

Assure with respect to permanent impoundments of water as part of the approved reclamation plan that:

The size of the impoundment and the availability of water are adequate for its intended purpose;

The impoundment dam construction will meet the requirements of applicable state and federal laws;

The quality of impounded water will be suitable on a permanent basis for its intended use and the discharges from the impoundment will not degrade the water quality in the receiving stream;

Final grading will provide adequate safety and access for anticipated water users;

Water impoundments will not result in the diminution of the quality or quantity of water utilized by adjacent or surrounding landowners; and

Protect off-site areas from slides or damage occurring during the surface mining and reclamation operations, and not deposit spoil material or locate any part of the operations or waste accumulations outside the permit area.

The purpose of this section is to cause the affected area to be restored to a useful, productive and beneficial purpose. A method of reclamation other than that provided in this section may be approved by the Permit Board if the Permit Board determines that the method of reclamation required by this section is not practical and that the alternative method will provide for the affected area to be restored to a useful, productive and beneficial purpose. If an alternative method of reclamation is generally applicable to all operations involving a particular material, the commission may promulgate appropriate rules and regulations for use of the alternative method.

Each operator, except as authorized by the Permit Board, shall perform reclamation work concurrently with the conduct of the mining operation where practical. The fact that an operator will likely redisturb an area shall be cause for the Permit Board to grant an exception from the requirement of concurrent reclamation.

The operator and, in case of bond forfeiture, the department or its designee, shall have the continuing right to enter and inspect the affected area in the reclamation plan and to perform any reclamation measures required properly to complete the reclamation plan.

If the commission finds that (i) reclamation of the affected area is not proceeding in accordance with the reclamation plan and that the operator has failed within thirty (30) days after notice to commence corrective action or (ii) revegetation has not been properly completed in conformance with the reclamation plan within two (2) years or longer, if required by the commission, after termination of mining operations or upon revocation of the permit, or if the Permit Board revokes a permit, the commission may initiate proceedings against the bond or deposit filed by the operator. The proceedings shall not be commenced with respect to a surety bond until the surety has been given sixty (60) days to commence and a reasonable opportunity to begin and complete corrective action.

A forfeiture proceeding against any performance bond or deposit shall be commenced and conducted according to Sections 49-17-31 through 49-17-41.

If the commission orders forfeiture of any performance bond or deposit, the entire sum of the performance bond or deposit shall be forfeited to the department. The funds from the forfeited performance bond or deposit shall be placed in the appropriate account in the fund and used to pay for reclamation of the permit area and remediation of any off-site damages resulting from the operation. Any surplus performance bond or deposit funds shall be refunded to the operator or corporate surety.

Forfeiture proceedings shall be before the commission and an order of the commission under this subsection is a final order. If the commission determines that forfeiture of the performance bond or deposit should be ordered, the department shall have the immediate right to all funds of any performance bond or deposit, subject only to review and appeals allowed under Section 49-17-41.

If the operator cannot be located for purposes of notice, the department shall send notice of the forfeiture proceeding, certified mail, return receipt requested, to the operator’s last known address. The department shall also publish notice of the forfeiture proceeding in a manner as required in regulation by the commission. Any formal hearing on the bond forfeiture shall be set at least thirty (30) days after the last notice publication.

If the performance bond or deposit is insufficient to cover the costs of reclamation of the permit area in accordance with the approved reclamation plan or remediation of any off-site damages, the commission may initiate a civil action to recover the deficiency amount in the county in which the surface mining operation is located.

If the commission initiates a civil action under this section, the commission shall be entitled to any sums necessary to complete reclamation of the permit area in accordance with the approved reclamation plan and remediate any off-site damages resulting from that operation.

If a landowner, upon termination or expiration of a lease, refuses to allow the operator to enter onto the property designated as the affected area to conduct or complete reclamation in accordance with the approved reclamation plan, or if the landowner interferes with or authorizes a third party to disturb or interfere with reclamation in accordance with the approved reclamation plan, the landowner shall assume the permit and shall file a reclamation plan and post a performance bond as required under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 11; Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 47; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-37.
Performance bonds.

Before a permit is issued by the Permit Board, the applicant shall file with the department in the manner and form required by the commission a bond for performance payable to the commission and conditioned on full and satisfactory performance of the requirements of this chapter and the permit. The bond shall not be less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for each estimated acre of the permit area of the respective operation.

The bond shall be executed by the applicant and a corporate surety licensed to do business in the state. The applicant may elect to deposit the following in lieu of the surety bond: cash, negotiable bonds of the United States government or the state, assignment of real or personal property or a savings account acceptable to the department, negotiable certificates of deposit or a letter of credit of any bank organized or transacting business in the state and insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC) or the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation (FSLIC) or a similar federal banking or savings and loan insurance organization. The cash deposit or market value of the securities shall be equal to or greater than the amount of the bond required for the permit area. Cash, negotiable bonds, negotiable certificates of deposit, letter of credit, assignment of real or personal property or a savings account or other securities shall be deposited on the same terms as the terms on which surety bonds may be deposited.

The amount of the bond or deposit required and the terms of acceptance of the applicant’s bond or deposit may be increased or decreased by the Permit Board from time to time to reflect changes in the cost of future reclamation of land mined or to be mined subject to the limitations on the amount of the bond set forth in this section.

All state agencies, political subdivisions of the state and local governing bodies shall be exempt from the bonding requirements of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 12; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-39.
Initial review of application by department; department to make recommendation to Permit Board; on-site inspection of proposed area as condition of granting permit.

The department shall conduct an initial review of a completed permit application within thirty (30) days following receipt of the completed application. The department shall make a recommendation to the Permit Board on the permit application no later than the next regularly scheduled Permit Board meeting following the thirty-day initial review period, unless a public hearing is held on the application or the applicant agrees in writing to an additional time frame. If a public hearing is held, the department shall make its recommendation at the next regularly scheduled Permit Board meeting following the public hearing, if practicable.

An on-site inspection of the proposed affected area shall be made by the department within the thirty-day time period specified in subsection (1) of this section, and before a permit is issued.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 13(1, 2); Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-41.
Authority of Permit Board to issue, reissue, deny, modify, revoke, cancel, rescind, suspend, or transfer permit; grounds for denial; public hearing; board may authorize executive director to make permit decisions.

The Permit Board, based upon the provisions of this chapter, may issue, reissue, deny, modify, revoke, cancel, rescind, suspend or transfer a permit for a surface mining operation. The head of the Office of Geology and Energy Resources shall abstain in any action taken by the Permit Board under this chapter.

The Permit Board shall issue a permit if the Permit Board determines that the applicant and completed application comply with the requirements of this chapter.

The Permit Board may deny a permit if:

The Permit Board finds that the reclamation as required by this chapter cannot be accomplished by means of the proposed reclamation plan;

Any part of the proposed operation lies within an area designated as unsuitable for surface mining as designated by Section 53-7-49 or 53-7-51;

The Permit Board finds that the proposed mining operation will cause pollution of any water of the state or of the ambient air of the state in violation of applicable state and federal laws and regulations;

The applicant has had any other permit issued under this chapter revoked, or any bond or deposit posted to comply with this chapter forfeited, and the conditions causing the permit to be revoked or the bond or deposit to be forfeited have not been corrected to the satisfaction of the Permit Board;

The Permit Board determines that the proposed operation will endanger the health and safety of the public or will create imminent environmental harm;

The operation will likely adversely affect any public highway or road unless the operation is intended to stabilize or repair the public road or highway; or

The applicant is unable to meet the public liability insurance or performance bonding requirements of this chapter.

The Permit Board shall deny a permit if the Permit Board finds by clear and convincing evidence on the basis of the information contained in the permit application or obtained by on-site inspection that the proposed operation cannot comply with this chapter or rules and regulations adopted under this chapter or that the proposed method of operation, road system construction, shaping or revegetation of the affected area cannot be carried out in a manner consistent with this chapter and applicable state and federal laws, rules and regulations.

The Permit Board may hold a public hearing to obtain comments from the public on its proposed action. If the Permit Board holds a public hearing, the Permit Board shall publish notice and conduct the hearing as provided in Section 49-17-29.

The Permit Board may authorize the executive director, under any conditions the Permit Board may prescribe, to make decisions on permit issuance, reissuance, modification, rescission or cancellation under this chapter. A decision by the executive director is a decision of the Permit Board and shall be subject to formal hearing and appeal as provided in Section 49-17-29. The executive director shall report all permit decisions to the Permit Board at its next regularly scheduled meeting and those decisions shall be deemed as recorded in the minutes of the Permit Board at that time.

The Permit Board may cancel a permit at the request of the operator, if the operator does not commence operations under the permit by stripping, grubbing or mining any part of the permit area. The Permit Board may rescind a permit, if, because of a change in post-mining use of the land by the landowner, the completion of the approved reclamation plan by the operator is no longer feasible. If a permit is canceled or rescinded, the remaining portion of the bond or deposit required under Section 53-7-37 shall be returned to the operator as soon as possible.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 13(3); Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-43.
Applications for modification, transfer, or reissuance of permit; right of successive reissuance upon expiration; term of reissuance; continuance of operation during reissuance process.

Applications for the modification, transfer or reissuance of any surface mining permit issued under this chapter may be filed with the department. The Permit Board may modify any surface mining permit to increase or decrease the permit area and shall require an increase in the performance bond and a modified reclamation plan for any expanded area.

Any permit issued under this chapter shall carry with it the right of successive reissuance upon expiration for areas within the boundaries of the existing permit. The operator may apply for reissuance and that permit shall be reissued, except as provided in this subsection. On application for reissuance the burden of proving that the permit should not be reissued shall be on the opponents of reissuance or the department. If the opponents to reissuance or the department establish and the Permit Board finds, in writing, that the operator is not satisfactorily meeting the terms and conditions of the existing permit or the present surface mining and reclamation operation is not in compliance with this chapter and the rules and regulations issued under this chapter, the Permit Board shall not reissue the permit.

Any permit reissuance shall be for a term not to exceed the term of the original permit established by this chapter. Application for permit reissuance shall be filed with the Permit Board at least sixty (60) days before the expiration of the permit. If an application for reissuance is timely filed, the operator may continue surface mining operations under the existing permit until the Permit Board takes action on the reissuance application.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 14; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-45.
Review of Permit Board action or decision.

Any interested party may seek a review or an appeal of any action or decision of the Permit Board under Sections 53-7-41 and 53-7-43 as provided in Section 49-17-29.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 15; Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 48; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 322; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 98; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-47.
Mining prohibited in national and state park lands.

To the extent that the commission, the Permit Board and the department may exercise jurisdiction over the areas specified in this section, no surface mining operation shall be conducted on lands which are part of a national park, national monument, national historic landmark, any property listed on the national register of historic places, national forest, national wilderness area, national wildlife refuge, national wild or scenic river, state scenic stream, state park, state wildlife refuge, state forest, recorded state historical landmark, state historic site, state archaeological landmark or city or county park, forest or historical area. For good cause shown and after any public hearing the commission may elect to hold, the commission may make an exception to this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 16(1); Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-49.
Designation of certain lands as unsuitable for surface mining; criteria for designation.

With the assistance of the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources, the commission shall identify and designate as unsuitable certain lands for all or certain types of surface mining. The commission shall adopt rules and regulations to provide reasonable notice to prospective operators and any other interested parties of areas which might be designated as unsuitable for surface mining. The commission may designate areas as unsuitable for surface mining lands if the commission determines:

The operations will result in significant damage to important areas of historic, cultural or archaeological value or to important natural systems;

The operations will affect renewable resource lands resulting in a substantial loss or reduction of long-range productivity of water supply or food or fiber products, including aquifers and aquifer recharge areas;

The operations are located in areas of unstable geological formations and may reasonably be expected to endanger life and property;

The operations will damage ecologically sensitive areas;

The operations will significantly and adversely affect any national park, national monument, national historic landmark, property listed on the national register of historic places, national forest, national wilderness area, national wildlife refuge, national wild or scenic river area, state scenic stream, state park, state wildlife refuge, state forest, recorded state historical landmark, state historic site, state archaeological landmark, or city or county park;

The operations will endanger any public road, public building, cemetery, school, church or similar structure or existing dwelling outside the permit area; or

The operations and the affected area cannot be reclaimed feasibly under the requirements of this chapter.

Unless an operation is exempted under Section 53-7-7(2)(a) or 53-7-7(2)(b), it is unlawful to conduct surface mining operations within an area designated as unsuitable for surface mining under Section 53-7-51 or this section or to conduct surface mining operations in rivers, lakes, bayous, intermittent or perennial streams or navigable waterways, natural or manmade, without a permit or coverage under a general permit issued or reissued consistent with regulations adopted by the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 16(2); Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 323; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 99; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-51.
Designation of certain lands as unsuitable for surface mining; petition for modification, amendment or termination of designation; appeal.

The commission, upon petition, may designate an area as unsuitable for mining or modify or terminate the designation of an area as unsuitable for surface mining. The commission, upon its own motion, may terminate the designation of an area as unsuitable for surface mining. The commission may conduct a public hearing on its proposed action in accordance with Section 49-17-33. Before terminating an area as unsuitable for surface mining, the commission shall provide notice as required under Section 53-7-11.

A petition shall contain allegations of facts with supporting evidence. The commission shall make a determination based upon the validity of the facts contained in the petition, and may designate, modify or terminate the designation of the lands included in the petition as unsuitable for mining.

Any person aggrieved by an action of the commission under this section may appeal as provided in Section 49-17-41.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 16(3, 4); Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 49; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-53.
Records, reports and equipment to be maintained by permittees.

The Permit Board shall require each permittee to:

Establish and maintain appropriate records;

Make reports, the frequency and nature of which shall be prescribed by the commission; and

Install, use and maintain any necessary monitoring equipment for the purpose of observing and determining relevant surface or subsurface effects of the mining operation or reclamation program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 17(1); Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-55.
Inspection by department; inspection reports; procedure on detection of violation.

Authorized representatives of the department, on presentation of appropriate credentials, may enter and inspect any operation or any premises in which records required to be maintained under Section 53-7-53 are located and may at reasonable times, and without delay, have access to and copy any records and inspect any monitoring equipment or method of operation required under this chapter.

Inspections of operations with or without a permit by the department shall occur on an irregular basis at a frequency necessary to insure compliance with this chapter, rules and regulations and the terms and conditions of any permit. Inspections shall occur only during normal operating hours if practical, may occur without prior notice to the permittee or the agents or employees of the permittee, and shall include the filing of an inspection report. The department shall make those reports part of the record and shall provide one (1) copy of the report to the operator. The department shall, as practical, establish a system of rotation of field inspectors.

Each field inspector, on detection of each violation of this chapter, rules and regulations adopted under this chapter or the permit for the operation, shall inform the operator or the operator’s agent orally at the time of the inspection and subsequently in writing and shall report any violation in writing to the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 17(2-4); Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 50; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-57.
Inspection by representatives of local soil and water conservation districts; recommendations of progress of reclamation activities.

Any representative of the local soil and water conservation district, upon presentation of appropriate credentials may enter and inspect the operation for the purpose of making recommendations regarding reclamation activities. The representative shall make any recommendations on the progress of reclamation activities in writing to the Permit Board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 17(5); Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-59.
Violations; penalties; appeals; commission authorized to pursue civil action for relief; limitation on liability.

Any person who violates, or fails or refuses to comply with this chapter, any rule or regulation or written order of the commission adopted or issued under this chapter or any condition of a permit or coverage under a general permit issued under this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty to be assessed and levied by the commission after notice and opportunity for a formal hearing. In addition to assessing civil penalties under this section, the commission may submit a written statement to the Permit Board recommending that the Permit Board revoke the permit for any operation which is subject to the maximum penalty of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00). Appeals of any action or decision of the commission may be taken as provided in Section 49-17-41.

Any civil penalty assessed against a permitted, covered or exempt operation and levied by the commission under this section shall not exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for the first violation; for subsequent violations committed within three (3) years of the first violation the maximum penalties are: Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for the second violation, Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for the third violation and Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for the fourth and subsequent violations by the same operator. Multiple violations at a site during one (1) day shall not be cumulative. A separate penalty shall not be assessed for each violation and only one (1) penalty may be assessed for all violations occurring at a site during one (1) day. Each day of a continuing violation shall be a separate violation until corrective action is taken or the operator after notice of the violation is diligently pursuing efforts to achieve compliance in a timely manner. In assessing a penalty under this subsection, the commission shall not consider offenses occurring before July 1, 2002. In addition to the civil penalty authorized under this subsection, the commission may order an operator of a permitted, covered or exempt operation to reclaim the affected area.

Any civil penalty assessed against an operator for mining without a permit and levied by the commission under this section shall not exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for the first violation, Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for the second violation and Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for the third and subsequent violations by an operator. In assessing a penalty under this subsection, the commission shall not consider violations occurring before July 1, 2002.

In determining the amount of penalty under this chapter, the commission shall consider at a minimum:

The willfulness of the violation;

Any damage to air, water, land or other natural resources of the state or their uses;

Costs of restoration and abatement;

Economic benefit as a result of noncompliance;

The seriousness of the violation, including any harm to the environment and any hazard to the health, safety and welfare of the public; and

Past performance history.

The commission may institute and maintain a civil action for relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction or any other appropriate order, in the chancery court of the county in which the majority of the surface mining operation is located. The chancery court shall have jurisdiction to provide relief as may be appropriate. Any relief granted by the court to enforce a written order of the commission shall continue in effect until the completion of all proceedings for review of that order under this chapter, unless the chancery court granting the relief sets it aside or modifies it before that time.

Any provisions of this section and chapter regarding liability for the costs of cleanup, removal, remediation or abatement of any pollution, hazardous waste or solid waste shall be limited as provided in Section 49-17-42 and rules adopted under that section.

Any violation of this law and the Mississippi Air and Water Pollution Control Law or the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974 shall be assessed a civil penalty under only one (1) of these laws.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 18(1-3); Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 51; Laws, 1995, ch. 627, § 10; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-61.
Criminal penalties for false statement, representation or certification; willful violations.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation or certification, or knowingly fails to make any statement, representation or certification in any application, record, report, plan or other document filed or required to be maintained under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction, may be subject to a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).

Any person who knowingly violates, or fails or refuses to comply with this chapter, any rule or regulation or written order of the commission adopted or issued under this chapter, or any condition of a permit issued under this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be subject to a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 18(4, 5) eff from and after April 15, 1978; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-63.
Request for formal hearing by aggrieved party; authority to subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, examine witnesses and conduct hearing.

Unless otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, any interested party aggrieved by any action of the Permit Board taken under this chapter may request a formal hearing before the Permit Board as provided in Section 49-17-29. Any person aggrieved by any action of the commission taken under this chapter may request a formal hearing before the commission as provided in Section 49-17-41. Any person who participated as a party in a formal hearing before the Permit Board may appeal from a final decision of the Permit Board made under this chapter as provided in Section 49-17-29. Any person who participated as a party in a formal hearing before the commission may appeal from a final decision of the commission made under this chapter as provided in Section 49-17-41.

Any public hearing of the Permit Board provided for under this chapter shall be deemed to be the same hearing as otherwise afforded to any interested party by the Permit Board under Section 49-17-29. Any formal hearing of the Permit Board provided for under this chapter shall be deemed to be the same hearing as otherwise afforded to any interested party by the Permit Board under Section 49-17-29.

Any public hearing of the commission provided for under this chapter shall be deemed to be the same hearing as afforded under Section 49-17-35. Any formal hearing of the commission provided for under this chapter shall be deemed to be the same hearing as afforded under Section 49-17-41.

In conducting any formal hearing under this chapter, the Permit Board shall have the same authority to subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, examine witnesses under oath and conduct the hearing as provided in Section 49-17-29.

In conducting any formal hearing under this chapter the commission shall have the same authority to subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, examine witnesses under oath and conduct the hearing as provided in Section 49-17-41.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 18(6); Laws, 1995, ch. 627, § 11; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-65.
Report or complaint alleging violation; investigation; hearing; order; notice; proof of service; appeal.

When an employee of the department files a report alleging a violation or when any person files a complaint with the commission alleging that any other person is in violation of this chapter, any rule and regulation issued under this chapter, or any condition of a permit issued under this chapter, the commission shall notify the alleged violator and conduct an investigation of the complaint. Upon finding a basis for the complaint, the commission shall cause written notice of the complaint, specifying the section of law, rule, regulation or permit alleged to be violated and the facts of the alleged violations, to be served upon that person. The commission may require the person to appear before the commission at a time and place specified in the notice to answer the charges. The time of appearance before the commission shall be not less than twenty (20) days from the date of the mailing or service of the complaint, whichever is earlier. If the commission finds no basis for the complaint, the commission shall dismiss the complaint.

The commission shall afford an opportunity for a formal hearing to the alleged violator at the time and place specified in the notice or at another time or place agreed to in writing by both the department and the alleged violator, and approved by the commission. On the basis of the evidence produced at the formal hearing, the commission may enter an order which in its opinion will best further the purposes of this chapter and shall give written notice of that order to the alleged violator and to any other persons which appeared at the formal hearing or made written request for notice of the order. The commission may assess penalties as provided in Section 53-7-59. Any formal hearing under this section shall be of record.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, any notice or other instrument issued by or under authority of the commission may be served on any affected person personally or by publication, and proof of that service may be made in the same manner as in case of service of a summons in a civil action. The proof of service shall be filed in the office of the commission. Service may also be made by mailing a copy of the notice, order, or other instrument by certified mail, directed to the person affected at the person’s last known post office address as shown by the files or records of the commission. Proof of service may be made by the affidavit of the person who did the mailing and shall be filed in the office of the commission.

Any person who participated as a party in the formal hearing may appeal a decision of the commission under this section as provided in Section 49-17-41.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 19; Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 52; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 2002.